Utah statutes.
73-10-11.   Counsel to board and representative -- Utilization of other departments -- Duty of executive secretary of board to collect on water contracts.

The attorney general shall act as legal counsel to the board, and to its representative as hereinbefore provided for, and the board shall wherever practicable utilize the services and facilities of other departments of the state government. The executive secretary of the Utah water and power board shall be charged with the duty of collecting any and all amounts due on contracts with water users.

